Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4758.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "reemployment services for dislocated federal employees act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Dislocated federal employee" means an individual who resides in this state and who involuntarily lost the employee's job with the federal government for reasons beyond the employee's control on or after January 20, 2025 but before January 20, 2027. (b) "Michigan works agency" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan works one-stop service center system act, 2006 PA 491, MCL 408.113. (c) "Michigan works area" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan works one-stop service center system act, 2006 PA 491, MCL 408.113. (d) "Public employer" means this state; a city, village, township, county, or other political subdivision of this state; any intergovernmental, metropolitan, or local department, agency, or authority, or other local political subdivision; a school district, a public school academy, or an intermediate school district, as those terms are defined in the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852; or a community college or junior college described in section 7 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963. Public employer includes a public university that elects to come under the provisions of this act. (e) "Veteran" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1965 PA 190, MCL 35.61. Sec. 5. Each Michigan works agency in collaboration with the department of labor and economic opportunity shall create a team that provides reemployment and unemployment services to dislocated federal employees and veterans for the Michigan works area for which the Michigan works agency administers workforce development activities. The services that the team must provide for a dislocated federal employee or a veteran include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) Analysis of jobs with public employers that are similar to the job the dislocated federal employee or veteran performed for the federal government. (b) Analysis of the dislocated federal employee's or veteran's transferable skills. (c) Referral for employment to public employers that are understaffed. If the referral for employment is made to this state, the referral must comply with section 5 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963. (d) Referral for employment to private-sector employers. (e) Assistance with filing for benefits under the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.1 to 421.75. Sec. 6. Each state department and agency shall cooperate as necessary with the department of labor and economic opportunity and each Michigan works agency to identify dislocated federal employees and veterans who are eligible for the services provided under section 5.